Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-421
Intermediate
care facility for persons
with developmental disabilities, defined.

Intermediate
care facility for persons
with developmental disabilities means a facility where shelter,
food, and training or habilitation services, advice, counseling, diagnosis,
treatment, care, nursing care, or related services are provided for a period
of more than twenty-four consecutive hours to four or more persons residing
at such facility who have a developmental disability.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 21;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 27.